Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1079YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 3 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321P.7A Restrictions on collection 1 of fines. 2 1. A local authority shall not enter into or renew a 3 contract with a third party to collect a fine issued for a 4 violation detected by a system. 5 2. An unpaid fine issued for a violation detected by a 6 system shall not be considered qualifying debt under section 7 421.65 and is not subject to the setoff procedures provided for 8 in section 421.65. 9 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. 10 1. Section 321P.7A, subsection 1, as enacted by this Act, 11 applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or after the 12 effective date of this Act. 13 2. Section 321P.7A, subsection 2, as enacted by this Act, 14 applies to fines that are unpaid on or after the effective date 15 of this Act, regardless of the date of issuance. 16